Louisiana, session 2026, HB1194.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:296(B)(4) and (5), (C), (D)(1) through (3), (4)(a)(iii), (6)(a), and
(7)(e) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 3:296(D)(11) is hereby enacted to read
as follows:
§296. Healthy Food Retail Act; definitions; purpose
* * *
B. The legislature finds the following:
* * *
(4) Limited food access constrains public health, neighborhood stability, and
local economic growth. Developing quality retail food outlets also creates jobs,
expands markets for Louisiana farmers, and supports economic vitality in
underserved communities and food deserts.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1194 ENROLLED
(5) The program established pursuant to this Chapter is intended to provide
a dedicated source of financing for healthy food retailers operating in underserved
communities and food deserts in Louisiana, in both urban and rural areas; to increase
access to affordable healthy food so as to improve diets and health; to promote the
sale and consumption of fresh fruits and vegetables, particularly those that are
Louisiana grown; and to support expanded economic opportunities in low-income
and rural communities.
C. As used in this Chapter, the following terms and phrases shall have the
meanings hereinafter ascribed to them:
(1) "Food desert" means a low-income census tract in which at least five
hundred persons or thirty-three percent of residents reside more than one mile from
a supermarket in an urban area or more than ten miles from a supermarket in a rural
area.
(1) (2) "Funding" means grants, loans, or a combination of grants and loans.
(2) (3) "Healthy food retailers" means for-profit or not-for-profit retailers
that sell high quality fresh fruits and vegetables at competitive prices including but
not limited to supermarkets, grocery stores, and farmers' markets.
(3) (4) "Program" means a public-private partnership established to provide
a dedicated source of financing for food retailers that increase access to fresh fruits
and vegetables and other affordable healthy food for Louisiana residents managed
by the Louisiana Department of Agriculture and Forestry.
(4) (5) "Underserved community" means a geographic area that has limited
access to healthy food retailers and is located in a lower-income or high-poverty
area, or an area that is otherwise determined to have serious healthy food access
limitations.
D.(1) To the extent funds are available, the Louisiana Department of
Agriculture and Forestry, in cooperation with public and private sector partners, shall
establish administer a financing program that provides grants and loans to healthy
food retailers and related food access projects that increase access to fresh fruits and
vegetables and other affordable healthy food in underserved communities including
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1194 ENROLLED
verified food deserts, with priority given to projects located in such areas. The
department shall also prioritize projects that increase access to affordable fresh food
and demonstrate community demand, implementation capacity, and long-term
sustainability, to the extent that funding is available.
(2) The department may contract with one or more qualified nonprofit
organizations or community development financial institutions to administer all or
portions of the program described in this Section through a grants or public-private
partnership partnerships, to raise including raising matching funds, market marketing
the program statewide, evaluate evaluating applicants, make making award
decisions, underwrite underwriting loans, operating a revolving loan fund, and
monitor monitoring compliance and impact. The department and its partners shall
coordinate with complementary nutrition assistance and education programs.
(3) The program shall provide funding on a competitive, one-time basis as
appropriate for the eligible project.
(4)(a) The program may provide funding for projects such as:
* * *
(iii) Farmers' markets and public markets, food cooperatives, mobile markets
and delivery projects, and distribution projects that enable food retailers in
underserved communities or food deserts to regularly obtain fresh produce.
* * *
(6) In order to be considered for funding, an applicant shall meet the
following criteria:
(a) The project for which the applicant seeks funding shall benefit an
underserved community or a food desert.
* * *
(7) Applicants shall be evaluated on the following criteria in order to
determine the funding awarded:
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1194 ENROLLED
(e) The degree to which the project will have a positive economic impact on
the underserved community or food desert, including by creating or retaining jobs
for local residents.
* * *
(11) The Louisiana State University Agricultural Center shall collaborate
with the Louisiana Department of Agriculture and Forestry to provide data, research,
and technical information relative to the identification and geographic distribution
of food deserts across the state, from available sources.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.